vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX rC Y 28
SFX rC clore clore/ clore
SFX rC clore closant/ clore
SFX rC clore clos/ clore
SFX rC clore close/ clore
SFX rC clore closes/ clore
SFX rC clore clos/ clore
SFX rC clore clot/ clore
SFX rC clore closons/ clore
SFX rC clore closez/ clore
SFX rC clore closent/ clore
SFX rC clore clorai/ clore
SFX rC clore cloras/ clore
SFX rC clore clora/ clore
SFX rC clore clorons/ clore
SFX rC clore clorez/ clore
SFX rC clore cloront/ clore
SFX rC clore clorais/ clore
SFX rC clore clorait/ clore
SFX rC clore clorions/ clore
SFX rC clore cloriez/ clore
SFX rC clore cloraient/ clore
SFX rC clore close/ clore
SFX rC clore closes/ clore
SFX rC clore closions/ clore
SFX rC clore closiez/ clore
SFX rC clore clos/ clore
SFX rC clore closons/ clore
SFX rC clore closez/ clore

SFX rD Y 4
SFX rD clore clore/ clore
SFX rD clore clos/ clore
SFX rD clore close/ clore
SFX rD clore closes/ clore

SFX tA Y 44
SFX tA re re/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ant/ [dp]re
SFX tA re u/ [dp]re
SFX tA re us/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ue/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ues/ [dp]re
SFX tA re s/ [dp]re
SFX tA dre d/ dre
SFX tA pre pt/ pre
SFX tA re ons/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ez/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ent/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ais/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ait/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ions/ [dp]re
SFX tA re iez/ [dp]re
SFX tA re aient/ [dp]re
SFX tA re is/ [dp]re
SFX tA re it/ [dp]re
SFX tA re îmes/ [dp]re
SFX tA re îtes/ [dp]re
SFX tA re irent/ [dp]re
SFX tA re rai/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ras/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ra/ [dp]re
SFX tA re rons/ [dp]re
SFX tA re rez/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ront/ [dp]re
SFX tA re rais/ [dp]re
SFX tA re rait/ [dp]re
SFX tA re rions/ [dp]re
SFX tA re riez/ [dp]re
SFX tA re raient/ [dp]re
SFX tA re e/ [dp]re
SFX tA re es/ [dp]re
SFX tA re isse/ [dp]re
SFX tA re isses/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ît/ [dp]re
SFX tA re issions/ [dp]re
SFX tA re issiez/ [dp]re
SFX tA re issent/ [dp]re
SFX tA re s/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ons/ [dp]re
SFX tA re ez/ [dp]re

SFX tD Y 43
SFX tD perdre perdre/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdant/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdu/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdus/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdue/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdues/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perds/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perd/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdons/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdez/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdent/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdais/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdait/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdions/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdiez/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdaient/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdis/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdit/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdîmes/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdîtes/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdirent/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdrai/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdras/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdra/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdrons/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdrez/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdront/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdrais/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdrait/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdrions/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdriez/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdraient/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perde/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdes/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdisse/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdisses/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdît/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdissions/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdissiez/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdissent/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perds/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdons/ perdre
SFX tD perdre perdez/ perdre

SFX tE Y 39
SFX tE dre dre/ dre
SFX tE dre dant/ dre
SFX tE dre ds/ dre
SFX tE dre d/ dre
SFX tE dre dons/ dre
SFX tE dre dez/ dre
SFX tE dre dent/ dre
SFX tE dre dais/ dre
SFX tE dre dait/ dre
SFX tE dre dions/ dre
SFX tE dre diez/ dre
SFX tE dre daient/ dre
SFX tE dre dis/ dre
SFX tE dre dit/ dre
SFX tE dre dîmes/ dre
SFX tE dre dîtes/ dre
SFX tE dre dirent/ dre
SFX tE dre drai/ dre
SFX tE dre dras/ dre
SFX tE dre dra/ dre
SFX tE dre drons/ dre
SFX tE dre drez/ dre
SFX tE dre dront/ dre
SFX tE dre drais/ dre
SFX tE dre drait/ dre
SFX tE dre drions/ dre
SFX tE dre driez/ dre
SFX tE dre draient/ dre
SFX tE dre de/ dre
SFX tE dre des/ dre
SFX tE dre disse/ dre
SFX tE dre disses/ dre
SFX tE dre dît/ dre
SFX tE dre dissions/ dre
SFX tE dre dissiez/ dre
SFX tE dre dissent/ dre
SFX tE dre ds/ dre
SFX tE dre dons/ dre
SFX tE dre dez/ dre

SFX tF Y 42
SFX tF rendre rendre/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renant/ prendre
SFX tF rendre ris/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rise/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rises/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rends/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rend/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renons/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renez/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rennent/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renais/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renait/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renions/ prendre
SFX tF rendre reniez/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renaient/ prendre
SFX tF rendre ris/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rit/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rîmes/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rîtes/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rirent/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrai/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendras/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendra/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrons/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrez/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendront/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrais/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrait/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendrions/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendriez/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rendraient/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renne/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rennes/ prendre
SFX tF rendre risse/ prendre
SFX tF rendre risses/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rît/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rissions/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rissiez/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rissent/ prendre
SFX tF rendre rends/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renons/ prendre
SFX tF rendre renez/ prendre

SFX tG Y 42
SFX tG prendre prendre/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenant/ prendre
SFX tG prendre pris/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prise/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prises/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prends/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prend/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenons/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenez/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prennent/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenais/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenait/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenions/ prendre
SFX tG prendre preniez/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenaient/ prendre
SFX tG prendre pris/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prit/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prîmes/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prîtes/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prirent/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrai/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendras/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendra/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrons/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrez/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendront/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrais/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrait/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendrions/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendriez/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prendraient/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenne/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prennes/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prisse/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prisses/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prît/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prissions/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prissiez/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prissent/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prends/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenons/ prendre
SFX tG prendre prenez/ prendre

SFX tM Y 32
SFX tM outre outre/ foutre
SFX tM outre outant/ foutre
SFX tM outre outu/ foutre
SFX tM outre outus/ foutre
SFX tM outre outue/ foutre
SFX tM outre outues/ foutre
SFX tM outre ous/ foutre
SFX tM outre out/ foutre
SFX tM outre outons/ foutre
SFX tM outre outez/ foutre
SFX tM outre outent/ foutre
SFX tM outre outais/ foutre
SFX tM outre outait/ foutre
SFX tM outre outions/ foutre
SFX tM outre outiez/ foutre
SFX tM outre outaient/ foutre
SFX tM outre outrai/ foutre
SFX tM outre outras/ foutre
SFX tM outre outra/ foutre
SFX tM outre outrons/ foutre
SFX tM outre outrez/ foutre
SFX tM outre outront/ foutre
SFX tM outre outrais/ foutre
SFX tM outre outrait/ foutre
SFX tM outre outrions/ foutre
SFX tM outre outriez/ foutre
SFX tM outre outraient/ foutre
SFX tM outre oute/ foutre
SFX tM outre outes/ foutre
SFX tM outre ous/ foutre
SFX tM outre outons/ foutre
SFX tM outre outez/ foutre

SFX tU Y 5
SFX tU istre istre/ tistre
SFX tU istre issu/ tistre
SFX tU istre issus/ tistre
SFX tU istre issue/ tistre
SFX tU istre issues/ tistre
