vim/st.dic
appendre/tA
apprendre/tF
attendre/tA
comprendre/tF
condescendre/tEq.
confondre/tA
contrefoutre/tM
correspondre/tEq.
corrompre/tA
défendre/tA
démordre/tEq.
dépendre/tA
déprendre/tG
désapprendre/tF
descendre/tA
détendre/tA
détordre/tA
distendre/tA
distordre/tA
éclore/rC
entendre/tA
entreprendre/tF
épandre/tA
éperdre/tD
éprendre/tG
étendre/tA
fendre/tA
fondre/tA
forclore/rD
foutre/tM
interrompre/tA
méprendre/tG
mévendre/tA
mordre/tA
morfondre/tEq+
parfondre/tA
pendre/tA
perdre/tA
pondre/tA
pourfendre/tA
prendre/tF
prétendre/tA
rapprendre/tF
réapprendre/tF
redescendre/tA
réentendre/tA
refendre/tA
refondre/tA
refoutre/tM
remordre/tA
rendre/tA
répandre/tA
rependre/tA
reperdre/tA
répondre/tA
reprendre/tF
retendre/tA
retondre/tA
retordre/tA
revendre/tA
rompre/tA
surprendre/tF
surtendre/tA
survendre/tA
suspendre/tA
tendre/tA
tistre/tU
tondre/tA
tordre/tA
vendre/tA
